Maine, session 132, LD1857.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
PART A
Sec. A-1. 36 MRSA §653, sub-§1, ¶C, as amended by PL 2023, c. 441, Pt. B, §1
and affected by §7, is further amended to read:
C. The estates up to the just value of $6,000 $5,000, having a taxable situs in the place
of residence, of veterans who served in the Armed Forces of the United States:, except
that, for veterans who are 62 years of age or older, the exemption is up to $6,000 of the
just value.
(1) During any federally recognized war period, including the Korean Conflict,
the Vietnam War, the Persian Gulf War, the periods from August 24, 1982 to July
31, 1984 and December 20, 1989 to January 31, 1990, Operation Enduring
Freedom, Operation Iraqi Freedom and Operation New Dawn, or during the period
from February 1, 1955 to February 27, 1961, or who were awarded an
expeditionary medal for service in the Armed Forces of the United States, when
they have reached the age of 62 years or when they are receiving any form of
pension or compensation from the United States Government for total disability,
service-connected or nonservice-connected, as a veteran. A veteran of the Vietnam
War must have served on active duty after February 27, 1961 and before May 8,
1975. "Persian Gulf War" means service on active duty on or after August 2, 1990
and before or on the date that the United States Government recognizes as the end
of that war period; or
(2) Who are disabled by injury or disease incurred or aggravated during active
military service in the line of duty and are receiving any form of pension or
compensation from the United States Government for total, service-connected
disability.
The exemptions provided in this paragraph apply to the property of that veteran,
including property held in joint tenancy with that veteran's spouse or held in a revocable
living trust for the benefit of that veteran.
Sec. A-2. 36 MRSA §653, sub-§1, ¶C-1, as amended by PL 1995, c. 368, Pt. CCC,
§2 and affected by §11, is further amended to read:
C-1. The estates up to the just value of $7,000, having a taxable situs in the place of
residence of veterans who served in the Armed Forces of the United States during any
federally recognized war period during or before World War I and who would be
eligible for an exemption under paragraph C.
The exemption provided in this paragraph is in lieu of any exemption under paragraph
C to which the veteran may be eligible and applies to the property of that veteran,
including property held in joint tenancy with that veteran's spouse or held in a revocable
living trust for the benefit of that veteran.
Sec. A-3. 36 MRSA §653, sub-§1, ¶C-2 is enacted to read:
C-2. The estates, having a taxable situs in the place of residence of veterans who served
in the Armed Forces of the United States and have a service-connected disability rating
Page 1 - 132LR1856(01)

412 as determined by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs of 60% or greater,
423 as follows.
(1) For a veteran with a service-connected disability rating of 100%, the exemption
is up to $50,000 of the just value.
(2) For a veteran with a service-connected disability rating of 90%, the exemption
is up to $40,000 of the just value.
(3) For a veteran with a service-connected disability rating of 80%, the exemption
is up to $30,000 of the just value.
(4) For a veteran with a service-connected disability rating of 70%, the exemption
is up to $20,000 of the just value.
(5) For a veteran with a service-connected disability rating of 60%, the exemption
is up to $10,000 of the just value.
The exemptions provided in this paragraph apply to the property of the veteran,
including property held in joint tenancy with that veteran's spouse or held in a revocable
living trust for the benefit of that veteran.
Sec. A-4. 36 MRSA §653, sub-§1, ¶D, as amended by PL 2007, c. 240, Pt. PPPP,
§2, is repealed.
Sec. A-5. 36 MRSA §653, sub-§1, ¶D-1, as amended by PL 2023, c. 441, Pt. B,
§2 and affected by §7, is further amended to read:
D-1. The estates up to the just value of $50,000, having a taxable situs in the place of
residence, for specially adapted housing units, of veterans who served in the Armed
Forces of the United States during any federally recognized war period, including the
Korean Conflict, the Vietnam War, the Persian Gulf War, the periods from August 24,
1982 to July 31, 1984 and December 20, 1989 to January 31, 1990, Operation Enduring
Freedom, Operation Iraqi Freedom and Operation New Dawn, or during the period
from February 1, 1955 to February 27, 1961, or who were awarded an expeditionary
medal for service in the Armed Forces of the United States, and who are veterans as
described in 38 United States Code, Section 2101, and who received a grant from the
United States Government for any such housing, or of the unremarried widows or
widowers of those veterans. A veteran of the Vietnam War must have served on active
duty after February 27, 1961 and before May 8, 1975. "Persian Gulf War" means
service on active duty on or after August 2, 1990 and before or on the date that the
United States Government recognizes as the end of that war period. The exemption
provided in this paragraph applies to the property of the veteran including property
held in joint tenancy with a spouse or held in a revocable living trust for the benefit of
that veteran.
Sec. A-6. 36 MRSA §653, sub-§1, ¶D-2, as amended by PL 2003, c. 702, §3, is
repealed.
Sec. A-7. 36 MRSA §653, sub-§1, ¶D-3, as amended by PL 2003, c. 702, §4, is
repealed.
Sec. A-8. 36 MRSA §653, sub-§1, ¶D-4 is enacted to read:
Page 2 - 132LR1856(01)

D-4. Individuals seeking an exemption as the unremarried widow or widower or minor
child or parent of a veteran as described in paragraph E, subparagraphs (1) and (2) are
eligible for the exemption that the veteran would be eligible for pursuant to this section
if the veteran was living.
Sec. A-9. 36 MRSA §653, sub-§1, ¶E, as amended by PL 2023, c. 360, Pt. A, §7,
is further amended to read:
E. The word "veteran" as used in this subsection section means an individual who was
on active duty in the Armed Forces of the United States and who, if discharged, retired
or separated from the Armed Forces, was discharged, retired or separated under other
than dishonorable conditions. "Veteran" also includes:
(1) The unremarried widow or widower or minor child of a veteran who would be
entitled to an exemption under this section if living, or who is in receipt of a
pension or compensation from the Federal Government as the widow or widower
or minor child of a veteran; and
(2) The parent of a deceased veteran who is 62 years of age or older and is an
unremarried widow or widower who is in receipt of a pension or compensation
from the Federal Government based upon the service-connected death of that
parent's child.
Sec. A-10. 36 MRSA §841, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2017, c. 367, §8, is further
amended to read:
4. Veteran's widow or widower or minor child. Notwithstanding failure to comply
with section 706‑A, the assessors, on written application within one year from the date of
commitment, may make such abatement as they think proper in the case of the unremarried
widow or widower or the minor child of a veteran, if the widow, widower or child would
be entitled to an exemption under section 653, subsection 1, paragraph D D-4, except for
the failure of the widow, widower or child to make application and file proof within the
time set by section 653, subsection 1, paragraph G, if the veteran died during the 12-month
period preceding the April 1st for which the tax was committed.
Sec. A-11. Application. This Part applies to property tax years beginning on or after
April 1, 2026.
PART B
Sec. B-1. 10 MRSA §1100-T, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2021, c. 412, §4, is
further amended to read:
4. Total of credits authorized. The authority may issue tax credit certificates to
investors eligible pursuant to subsections 2, 2‑A and 2‑C in an aggregate amount not to
exceed $2,000,000 up to and including calendar year 1996, $3,000,000 up to and including
calendar year 1997, $5,500,000 up to and including calendar year 1998, $8,000,000 up to
and including calendar year 2001, $11,000,000 up to and including calendar year 2002,
$14,000,000 up to and including calendar year 2003, $17,000,000 up to and including
calendar year 2004, $20,000,000 up to and including calendar year 2005, $23,000,000 up
to and including calendar year 2006, $26,000,000 up to and including calendar year 2007
and $30,000,000 up to and including calendar year 2013, in addition to which, the authority
may issue tax credit certificates to investors eligible pursuant to subsections 2, 2‑A and 2‑C
Page 3 - 132LR1856(01)

414 in an annual amount not to exceed $675,000 for investments made between January 1, 2014
425 and December 31, 2014, $4,000,000 for investments made in calendar year 2015,
436 $5,000,000 for investments made in calendar years 2016 to 2019, $15,000,000 for
447 investments made in calendar year 2020, $13,500,000 for investments made in calendar
458 years 2021 and 2022, $15,000,000 for investments made in calendar years 2023 to 2026
469 and 2025, $10,000,000 for investments made in calendar year 2026 and $5,000,000 each
570 year for investments made in calendar years beginning with 2027. The authority may
581 provide that investors eligible for a tax credit under this section in a year when there is
592 insufficient credit available are entitled to take the credit when it becomes available subject
1503 to limitations established by the authority by rule. Rules adopted pursuant to this
1514 subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
Sec. B-2. 36 MRSA §191, sub-§2, ¶DDD, as repealed and replaced by PL 2017,
c. 375, Pt. D, §2, is repealed.
Sec. B-3. 36 MRSA §191, sub-§2, ¶UUU, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 667, §1, is
repealed.
Sec. B-4. 36 MRSA §2020, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 425, §1 and affected by §3,
is repealed.
Sec. B-5. 36 MRSA §4366-A, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2009, c. 361, §23, is
further amended to read:
2. Provided to sellers. The State Tax Assessor shall provide stamps to a licensed
distributor upon submission by the licensed distributor of a cigarette tax return in a form
prescribed by the assessor. The stamps must be of a design suitable to be affixed to
packages of cigarettes as evidence of the payment of the tax imposed by this chapter. The
assessor may permit a licensed distributor to pay for the stamps within 30 days after the
date of purchase, if a bond satisfactory to the assessor in an amount not less than 50% of
the sale price of the stamps has been filed with the assessor conditioned upon payment for
the stamps. Such a distributor may continue to purchase stamps on a 30-day deferral basis
only if it remains current with its cigarette tax obligations. The assessor may not sell
additional stamps to a distributor that has failed to pay in full within 30 days for stamps
previously purchased until such time as the overdue payment is received. The assessor
shall sell cigarette stamps to licensed distributors at the following discounts from their face
value:
D. For stamps at the face value of 100 mills, the discount rate is 1.15%.
Sec. B-6. 36 MRSA §5219-QQ, as amended by PL 2023, c. 157, §§1 to 3, is
repealed.
Sec. B-7. 36 MRSA §5219-BBB, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 667, §3, is repealed.
Sec. B-8. Application. The changes made by this Part apply to sales, purchases,
investments and other applicable transactions occurring on or after January 1, 2026.